District of Columbia statutes.
29-924

Subscribers.

Any individual or group eligible for membership and legally obligated to purchase a share or shares of, or membership in, an association shall be deemed a subscriber. The articles or bylaws may determine whether, and the conditions under which, any voting rights or other rights of membership are granted to subscribers.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-924.
1981 Ed., § 29-1124.
1973 Ed., § 29-824.